Hawaii statutes.
§443B-3.5 Designation as exempt
out-of-state collection agency; limitations on business practices; fees;
disciplinary action. (a) A collection agency that is not registered as a
collection agency in the State may apply for designation as an exempt out-of-state
collection agency by complying with the requirements of this section.

(b) To be designated as an exempt out-of-state
collection agency, a collection agency shall:

(1) Not have any employees or agents located in the
State who engage in the collection of debts for another person;

(2) Not have any business location or office in the
State that engages in collection agency activities;

(3) Hold a current, unrestricted, and unconditional
license, permit, or registration as a collection agency in the reciprocal state
identified in its application;

(4) Limit its collection activity in the State to the
collection of debts from residents of the State on behalf of out-of-state
clients through interstate communication by telephone, mail, facsimile, or electronic
mail; and

(5) Not collect debts on behalf of creditors who have
a business presence in the State.

For purposes of this section, a creditor has a
"business presence" in the State if either the creditor or an
affiliate or subsidiary of the creditor has an office in the State.

(c) An applicant for designation as an exempt
out-of-state collection agency shall submit the following:

(1) An application for designation as an exempt
out-of-state collection agency as prescribed by the director;

(2) Documentation that verifies the out-of-state
collection agency:

(A) Holds a current, unrestricted, and
unconditional license, permit, or registration as a collection agency in a
reciprocal state; and

(B) Is in good standing with and has complied
with the laws of the reciprocal state, including the maintenance of a bond in
the amount required by the reciprocal state;

(3) An agreement in writing to comply with the
requirements of all laws of the State that regulate collection practices,
including but not limited to the requirements of chapter 480D and this chapter,
other than registration and bonding as specified in subsection (e); and

(4) Payment of the following nonrefundable fees:

(A) With the application, an application fee
of $25; and

(B) Upon approval of an out-of-state
collection agency exemption, the compliance resolution fund fee for collection
agencies.

(d) A designated exempt out-of-state
collection agency may apply for renewal of the exemption biennially by June 30
of each even-numbered year.

(e) A collection agency that is designated as
an exempt out-of-state collection agency shall be exempt from the registration
requirements of this chapter and bonding requirements of section 443B-5;
provided that this section shall not exempt a collection agency from the
requirements of other laws that regulate collection practices in the State,
including but not limited to the requirements of chapter 480D and this chapter.

(f) A designated exempt out-of-state
collection agency shall not:

(1) Engage in collection activities in the State,
except for the collection of claims from residents of this State on behalf of
out-of-state clients through interstate communication by telephone, mail,
facsimile, or electronic mail, as specified in this chapter;

(2) Advertise or solicit, either in print, by letter,
in person, or otherwise, the right to collect or receive payment for another of
any debt from creditors who have a business presence in the State;

(3) Collect debts on behalf of a creditor who has a
business presence in the State;

(4) Collect debts in the State unless it maintains a
current, unrestricted, and unconditional license, permit, or registration as a
collection agency in the reciprocal state identified in its application;

(5) Bring or maintain any action involving the
collection of debts of its clients in any court of the State;

(6) Communicate with debtors in the State other than
by interstate communication by telephone, mail, facsimile, or electronic mail;

(7) Provide false or misleading information at the
time of initial or renewal application or during the period of exemption;

(8) Have any employees or agents located in the State
who engage in the collection of debts for another person;

(9) Have any business location or office in the State
that engages in collection agency activities; or

(10) Violate any of the provisions of this chapter.

(g) A collection agency shall not collect or
attempt to collect any money or any other form of indebtedness alleged to be
due and owing from any person who resides or does business in the State without
first registering under this chapter, or being designated as an exempt
out-of-state collection agency pursuant to this section.

(h) A designated exempt out-of-state
collection agency shall notify the director in writing of any judgment, award,
disciplinary action, consent decree, or order issued against it in any
jurisdiction within thirty days of the entry of the judgment, award,
disciplinary action, consent decree, or order.

(i) The failure of a designated exempt
out-of-state collection agency to maintain a current, unrestricted, and
unconditional license, permit, or registration in the reciprocal state
identified in its application shall cause the automatic forfeiture of the
exemption effective as of the date on which the designated exempt out-of-state
collection agency's license, permit, or registration is no longer current,
unrestricted, or unconditional in the reciprocal state identified in its
application. Any collection activity by the designated exempt out-of-state
collection agency after the forfeiture date shall be deemed to be unlicensed
activity. An out-of-state collection agency whose exemption is forfeited shall
apply as a new applicant for an exemption in order to resume business in the State.

(j) The remedies or penalties provided by this
section are cumulative to the remedies or penalties available under this
chapter and all other laws of the State.

(k) Any collection activity by a designated
exempt out-of-state collection agency, other than activity authorized by this
section, shall be deemed to be unlicensed activity.

(l) The director may deny or refuse to renew
an out-of-state collection agency's initial or renewal application for
exemption for failure to comply with this section, or for the grounds set forth
in sections 443B-4.57 or 436B-19.

(m) In order to effectuate this section and
enforce the requirements of this chapter as it relates to designated exempt
out-of-state collection agencies, the director is expressly authorized to
initiate any action on behalf of the State as may be appropriate in any state
or federal court of competent jurisdiction.

(n) For purposes of this section, a
"reciprocal state" is one:

(1) Whose requirements to be licensed, permitted, or
registered as a collection agency in that state are at a minimum substantially
equivalent to the requirements to be registered as a collection agency in this
State, including but not limited to the bonding requirements in section 443B-5;
and

(2) That does not require a Hawaii collection agency
to obtain a license, permit, or registration to collect debts in that state if
the activities of the Hawaii collection agency are limited to collecting debts
on behalf of an out-of-state creditor using interstate communication methods,
including telephone, facsimile, mail, or electronic mail, and the Hawaii
collection agency does not solicit or engage in collection activities for
clients in that state. [L 2000, c 135, §1; am L 2012, c 52, §1]

Cross References

Compliance resolution fund, see §26-9(o).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next